dev/postposition/postposition.ne.dix
  <!-- परक; परक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="परक__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भित्रै; भित्रै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भित्रै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ले; ले; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ले__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रभृति; प्रभृति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रभृति__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सामु; सामु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सामु__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मुनी; मुनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मुनी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पछि; पछि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पछि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पारिपट्टि; पारिपट्टि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पारिपट्टि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विपरीत; विपरीत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विपरीत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भरि; भरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भरि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लाई; लाई; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लाई__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अनरूप; अनरूप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अनरूप__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एकातिर; एकातिर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एकातिर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माहाँ; माहाँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माहाँ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मात्रै; मात्रै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मात्रै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पट्टि; पट्टि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पट्टि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यता; यता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यता__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ताका; ताका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ताका__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिच; बिच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बिच__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जत्रा; जत्रा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जत्रा__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जस्तै; जस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जस्तै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सगँ; सगँ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सगँ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रूपी; रूपी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रूपी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वारे; वारे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वारे__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निहित; निहित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निहित__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वारीपारी; वारीपारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वारीपारी__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वापत; वापत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वापत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माझ; माझ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माझ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्थित; स्थित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्थित__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विपरित; विपरित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विपरित__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निकट; निकट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निकट__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरि; सरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सरह; सरह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सरह__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मन्तीर; मन्तीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मन्तीर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वीच-वीच; वीच-वीच; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वीच-वीच__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कन; कन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कन__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साथ; साथ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साथ__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जसमध्ये; जसमध्ये; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जसमध्ये__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तीर; तीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तीर__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खेरि; खेरि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खेरि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बारे; बारे; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बारे__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्तरगत; अन्तरगत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्तरगत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वाटै; वाटै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वाटै__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कि; कि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कि__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- का; का; 1 -->
    <pardef n="का__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रहीत; रहीत; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रहीत__pst">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="pst"/><s n=""/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="परक"><i>परक</i><par n="परक__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भित्रै"><i>भित्रै</i><par n="भित्रै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="ले"><i>ले</i><par n="ले__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रभृति"><i>प्रभृति</i><par n="प्रभृति__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सामु"><i>सामु</i><par n="सामु__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मुनी"><i>मुनी</i><par n="मुनी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पछि"><i>पछि</i><par n="पछि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पारिपट्टि"><i>पारिपट्टि</i><par n="पारिपट्टि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="विपरीत"><i>विपरीत</i><par n="विपरीत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="भरि"><i>भरि</i><par n="भरि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="लाई"><i>लाई</i><par n="लाई__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अनरूप"><i>अनरूप</i><par n="अनरूप__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="एकातिर"><i>एकातिर</i><par n="एकातिर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="माहाँ"><i>माहाँ</i><par n="माहाँ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मात्रै"><i>मात्रै</i><par n="मात्रै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="पट्टि"><i>पट्टि</i><par n="पट्टि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="यता"><i>यता</i><par n="यता__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="ताका"><i>ताका</i><par n="ताका__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बिच"><i>बिच</i><par n="बिच__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जत्रा"><i>जत्रा</i><par n="जत्रा__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जस्तै"><i>जस्तै</i><par n="जस्तै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सगँ"><i>सगँ</i><par n="सगँ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="रूपी"><i>रूपी</i><par n="रूपी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वारे"><i>वारे</i><par n="वारे__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निहित"><i>निहित</i><par n="निहित__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वारीपारी"><i>वारीपारी</i><par n="वारीपारी__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वापत"><i>वापत</i><par n="वापत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="माझ"><i>माझ</i><par n="माझ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="स्थित"><i>स्थित</i><par n="स्थित__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="विपरित"><i>विपरित</i><par n="विपरित__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="निकट"><i>निकट</i><par n="निकट__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सरि"><i>सरि</i><par n="सरि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="सरह"><i>सरह</i><par n="सरह__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="मन्तीर"><i>मन्तीर</i><par n="मन्तीर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वीच-वीच"><i>वीच-वीच</i><par n="वीच-वीच__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="कन"><i>कन</i><par n="कन__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="साथ"><i>साथ</i><par n="साथ__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="जसमध्ये"><i>जसमध्ये</i><par n="जसमध्ये__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="तीर"><i>तीर</i><par n="तीर__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="खेरि"><i>खेरि</i><par n="खेरि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="बारे"><i>बारे</i><par n="बारे__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्तरगत"><i>अन्तरगत</i><par n="अन्तरगत__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="वाटै"><i>वाटै</i><par n="वाटै__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="कि"><i>कि</i><par n="कि__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="का"><i>का</i><par n="का__pst"/></e>
    <e lm="रहीत"><i>रहीत</i><par n="रहीत__pst"/></e>
